dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX a5 Y 119
SFX a5 er er/n'q'd'm't's' er
SFX a5 er ant/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cant/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geant/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er e/q' er
SFX a5 er e/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer ye/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er es/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yes/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ies/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er e/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer ye/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ons/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cons/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geons/n't' ger
SFX a5 r z/n'm' er
SFX a5 er ent/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yent/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ient/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ais/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cais/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geais/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er ais/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cais/n'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geais/n'm't' ger
SFX a5 er ait/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cait/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geait/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er ions/n't' er
SFX a5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX a5 er aient/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer caient/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geaient/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er ai/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cai/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geai/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er as/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cas/n'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geas/n'm't' ger
SFX a5 er a/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer ca/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger gea/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er ames/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cames/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geames/n't' ger
SFX a5 er ates/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cates/n'm' cer
SFX a5 ger geates/n'm' ger
SFX a5 er erent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX a5 er erai/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerai/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierai/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eras/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeras/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieras/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er era/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yera/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer iera/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erons/n't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerons/n't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierons/n't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erez/n'm' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerez/n'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierez/n'm' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eront/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeront/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieront/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erais/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerais/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierais/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erais/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerais/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierais/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erait/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerait/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierait/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er erions/n't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yerions/n't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ierions/n't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eriez/n'm' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeriez/n'm' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieriez/n'm' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yeraient/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ieraient/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er e/n'j'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer ye/n'j'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'j'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er es/n'm't' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yes/n'm't' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ies/n'm't' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er e/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer ye/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ie/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er ions/n't' er
SFX a5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX a5 er ent/n'q'm't's' [^y]er
SFX a5 yer yent/n'q'm't's' [^ou]yer
SFX a5 yer ient/n'q'm't's' [aou]yer
SFX a5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer casse/n'j'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geasse/n'j'm't' ger
SFX a5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer casses/n'm't' cer
SFX a5 ger geasses/n'm't' ger
SFX a5 er at/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cat/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geat/n'q'm't's' ger
SFX a5 er assions/n't' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cassions/n't' cer
SFX a5 ger geassions/n't' ger
SFX a5 er assiez/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cassiez/n'm' cer
SFX a5 ger geassiez/n'm' ger
SFX a5 er assent/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX a5 cer cassent/n'q'm't's' cer
SFX a5 ger geassent/n'q'm't's' ger

SFX a8 Y 77
SFX a8 er er/s' er
SFX a8 er ant/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cant/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geant/s' ger
SFX a8 er e er
SFX a8 er e/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer ye/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ie/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er ons [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cons cer
SFX a8 ger geons ger
SFX a8 er ez er
SFX a8 er ent/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yent/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ient/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er ait/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cait/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geait/s' ger
SFX a8 er ions er
SFX a8 er iez er
SFX a8 er aient/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer caient/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geaient/s' ger
SFX a8 er a/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer ca/s' cer
SFX a8 ger gea/s' ger
SFX a8 er ames [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cames cer
SFX a8 ger geames ger
SFX a8 er ates [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cates/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geates/s' ger
SFX a8 er erent/s' er
SFX a8 er era/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yera/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer iera/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er erons [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yerons [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ierons [aou]yer
SFX a8 er erez [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yerez [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ierez [aou]yer
SFX a8 er eront/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yeront/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ieront/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er erait/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yerait/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ierait/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er erions [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yerions [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ierions [aou]yer
SFX a8 er eriez [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yeriez [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ieriez [aou]yer
SFX a8 er eraient/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yeraient/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ieraient/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er e/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer ye/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ie/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er ions er
SFX a8 er iez er
SFX a8 er ent/s' [^y]er
SFX a8 yer yent/s' [^ou]yer
SFX a8 yer ient/s' [aou]yer
SFX a8 er at/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cat/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geat/s' ger
SFX a8 er assions [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cassions cer
SFX a8 ger geassions ger
SFX a8 er assiez [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cassiez cer
SFX a8 ger geassiez ger
SFX a8 er assent/s' [^cg]er
SFX a8 cer cassent/s' cer
SFX a8 ger geassent/s' ger

SFX a9 N 13
SFX a9 er er/n'd' er
SFX a9 er ant er
SFX a9 er e er
SFX a9 er e/n' er
SFX a9 er ait/n' [^g]er
SFX a9 ger geait/n' ger
SFX a9 er a/n' [^g]er
SFX a9 ger gea/n' ger
SFX a9 er era/n' er
SFX a9 er erait/n' er
SFX a9 er e/n' er
SFX a9 er at/n' [^g]er
SFX a9 ger geat/n' ger
