dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
acquiescer/a5()
attenter/a5()
barder/a9a+()
bichoter/a9a+()
boumer/a9()
brouillasser/a9()
bruiner/a9()
brumasser/a9()
brumer/a9()
contre-pousser/a8a+()
crachiner/a9()
dracher/a9()
entraccorder/a8a+()
entraccuser/a8a+()
entradmirer/a8a+()
entraider/a8a+()
entr'aimer/a8a+()
entre-dechirer/a8a+()
entre-devorer/a8a+()
entre-frapper/a8a+()
entr'egorger/a8a+()
entre-heurter/a8a+()
entre-louer/a8a+()
entre-manger/a8a+()
entre-regarder/a8a+()
entre-tuer/a8a+()
exciper/a5()
gouttiner/a9()
greler/a9a+()
gresiller/a9()
interfonctionner/a9()
neigeoter/a9()
neiger/a9()
obvier/a5()
pleuvasser/a9()
pleuviner/a9()
pleuvioter/a9()
pleuvoter/a9()
pluviner/a9()
reneiger/a9()
tangenter/a9()
urger/a9()
vaser/a9()
venter/a9()
verglacer/a9()
